Washington statutes.
RCW 35.92.054

May acquire electrical distribution property from public utility district.

Any city or town may acquire by purchase or condemnation from any public utility district or combination of public utility districts any electrical distribution property within the boundaries of such city or town: PROVIDED, That such right of condemnation shall not apply to a city or town located within a public utility district that owns the electric distribution properties sought to be condemned.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.92.054. Prior: 1953 c 97 s 1; 1951 c 272 s 1. Formerly RCW 80.40.054.]

NOTES:

Right of countywide utility district to acquire distribution properties: RCW 54.32.040.